 _Chapter 5_
 The Ride of the Rohirrim
 It was dark and Merry could see nothing as he lay on the ground rolled in a blanket; yet though
the night was airless and windless, all about him hidden trees were sighing softly. He lifted his head.
Then he heard it again: a sound like faint drums in the wooded hills and mountain-steps. The throb
would cease suddenly and then be taken up again at some other point, now nearer, now further off.
He wondered if the watchmen had heard it.
 He could not see them, but he knew that all round him were the companies of the Rohirrim. He
could smell the horses in the dark, and could hear their shiftings and their soft stamping on the
needle-covered ground. The host was bivouacked in the pine-woods that clustered about Eilenach
Beacon, a tall hill standing up from the long ridges of the Drúadan Forest that lay beside the great
road in East Anórien.
 Tired as he was Merry could not sleep. He had ridden now for four days on end, and the everdeepening
gloom had slowly weighed down his heart. He began to wonder why he had been so
eager to come, when he had been given every excuse, even his lord's command, to stay behind. He
wondered, too, if the old King knew that he had been disobeyed and was angry. Perhaps not. There
seemed to be some understanding between Dernhelm and Elfhelm, the Marshal who commanded
the _éored_ in which they were riding. He and all his men ignored Merry and pretended not to hear
if he spoke. He might have been just another bag that Dernhelm was carrying. Dernhelm was no
comfort: he never spoke to anyone. Merry felt small, unwanted, and lonely. Now the time was
anxious, and the host was in peril. They were less than a day's ride from the out-walls of Minas
Tirith that encircled the townlands. Scouts had been sent ahead. Some had not returned. Others
hastening back had reported that the road was held in force against them. A host of the enemy was
encamped upon it, three miles west of Amon Dîn, and some strength of men was already thrusting
along the road and was no more than three leagues away. Orcs were roving in the hills and woods
along the roadside. The king and Éomer held council in the watches of the night.
 Merry wanted somebody to talk to, and he thought of Pippin. But that only increased his
restlessness. Poor Pippin, shut up in the great city of stone, lonely and afraid. Merry wished he was
a tall Rider like Éomer and could blow a horn or something and go galloping to his rescue. He sat
up, listening to the drums that were beating again, now nearer at hand. Presently he heard voices
speaking low, and he saw dim half-shrouded lanterns passing through the trees. Men nearby began
to move uncertainly in the dark.
 A tall figure loomed up and stumbled over him, cursing the tree-roots. He recognized the voice
of the Marshal, Elfhelm.
 'I am not a tree-root, Sir,' he said, 'nor a bag, but a bruised hobbit. The least you can do in
amends is to tell me what is afoot.'
 'Anything that can keep so in this devil's mirk,' answered Elfhelm. 'But my lord sends word that
we must set ourselves in readiness: orders may come for a sudden move.'
 'Is the enemy coming then?' asked Merry anxiously. 'Are those their drums? I began to think I
was imagining them, as no one else seemed to take any notice of them.'
 'Nay, nay,' said Elfhelm, 'the enemy is on the road not in the hills. You hear the Woses, the Wild
Men of the Woods: thus they talk together from afar. They still haunt Drúadan Forest, it is said.
Remnants of an older time they be, living few and secretly, wild and wary as the beasts. They go
not to war with Gondor or the Mark; but now they are troubled by the darkness and the coming of
the orcs: they fear lest the Dark Years be returning, as seems likely enough. Let us be thankful that
they are not hunting us: for they use poisoned arrows, it is said, and they are woodcrafty beyond
compare. But they have offered their services to Théoden. Even now one of their headmen is being
taken to the king. Yonder go the lights. So much I have heard but no more. And now I must busy
myself with my lord's commands. Pack yourself up, Master Bag!' He vanished into the shadows.
 Merry did not like this talk of wild men and poisoned darts, but quite apart from that a great
weight of dread was on him. Waiting was unbearable. He longed to know what was going to
happen. He got up and soon was walking warily in pursuit of the last lantern before it disappeared
among the trees.
 Presently he came to an open space where a small tent had been set up for the king under a great
tree. A large lantern, covered above, was hanging from a bough and cast a pale circle of light below.
There sat Théoden and Éomer, and before them on the ground sat a strange squat shape of a man,
gnarled as an old stone, and the hairs of his scanty beard straggled on his lumpy chin like dry moss.
He was short-legged and fat-armed, thick and stumpy, and clad only with grass about his waist.
Merry felt that he had seen him before somewhere, and suddenly he remembered the Púkel-men of
Dunharrow. Here was one of those old images brought to life, or maybe a creature descended in
true line through endless years from the models used by the forgotten craftsmen long ago.
 There was a silence as Merry crept nearer, and then the Wild Man began to speak, in answer to
some question, it seemed. His voice was deep and guttural, yet to Merry's surprise he spoke the
Common Speech, though in a halting fashion, and uncouth words were mingled with it.
 'No, father of Horse-men,' he said, 'we fight not. Hunt only. Kill _gorgûn_ in woods, hate orcfolk. You
hate _gorgûn_ too. We help as we can. Wild Men have long ears and long eyes; know all
paths. Wild Men live here before Stone-houses; before Tall Men come up out of Water.'
 'But our need is for aid in battle,' said Éomer. 'How will you and your folk help us?'
 'Bring news,' said the Wild Man. 'We look out from hills. We climb big mountain and look
down. Stone-city is shut. Fire burns there outside; now inside too. You wish to come there? Then
you must be quick. But _gorgûn_ and men out of far-away,' he waved a short gnarled arm eastward,
'sit on horse-road. Very many, more than Horse-men.'
 'How do you know that?' said Éomer.
 The old man's flat face and dark eyes showed nothing, but his voice was sullen with displeasure.
'Wild men are wild, free, but not children,' he answered. 'I am great headman, Ghân-buri-Ghân. I
count many things: stars in sky, leaves on trees, men in the dark. You have a score of scores
counted ten times and five. They have more. Big fight, and who will win? And many more walk
round walls of Stone-houses.'
 'Alas! he speaks all too shrewdly,' said Théoden. 'And our scouts say that they have cast trenches
and stakes across the road. We cannot sweep them away in sudden onset.'
 'And yet we need great haste,' said Éomer. 'Mundburg is on fire!'
 'Let Ghân-buri-Ghân finish!' said the Wild Man. 'More than one road he knows. He will lead
you by road where no pits are, no _gorgûn_ walk, only Wild Men and beasts. Many paths were
made when Stonehouse-folk were stronger. They carved hills as hunters carve beast-flesh. Wild
Men think they ate stone for food. They went through Drúadan to Rimmon with great wains. They
go no longer. Road is forgotten, but not by Wild Men. Over hill and behind hill it lies still under
grass and tree, there behind Rimmon and down to Dîn, and back at the end to Horse-men's road.
Wild Men will show you that road. Then you will kill _gorgûn_ and drive away bad dark with
bright iron, and Wild Men can go back to sleep in the wild woods.'
 Éomer and the king spoke together in their own tongue. At length Théoden turned to the Wild
Man. 'We will receive your offer,' he said. 'For though we leave a host of foes behind, what matter?
If the Stone-city falls, then we shall have no returning. If it is saved, then the orc-host itself will be
cut off. If you are faithful, Ghân-buri-Ghân, then we will give you rich reward, and you shall have
the friendship of the Mark for ever.'
 'Dead men are not friends to living men, and give them no gifts,' said the Wild Man. 'But if you
live after the Darkness, then leave Wild Men alone in the woods and do not hunt them like beasts
any more. Ghân-buri-Ghân will not lead you into trap. He will go himself with father of Horse-men,
and if he leads you wrong, you will kill him.'
 'So be it!' said Théoden.
 'How long will it take to pass by the enemy and come back to the road?' asked Éomer. 'We must
go at foot-pace, if you guide us; and I doubt not the way is narrow.'
 'Wild Men go quick on feet,' said Ghân. 'Way is wide for four horses in Stonewain Valley
yonder,' he waved his hand southwards; 'but narrow at beginning and at end. Wild Man could walk
from here to Dîn between sunrise and noon.'
 'Then we must allow at least seven hours for the leaders,' said Éomer; 'but we must reckon rather
on some ten hours for all. Things unforeseen may hinder us, and if our host is all strung out, it will
be long ere it can be set in order when we issue from the hills. What is the hour now?'
 'Who knows?' said Théoden. 'All is night now.'
 'It is all dark, but it is not all night.' said Ghân. 'When Sun comes we feel her, even when she is
hidden. Already she climbs over East-mountains. It is the opening of day in the sky-fields.'
 'Then we must set out as soon as may be,' said Éomer. 'Even so we cannot hope to come to
Gondor's aid today.'
 Merry waited to hear no more, but slipped away to get ready for the summons to the march. This
was the last stage before the battle. It did not seem likely to him that many of them would survive it.
But he thought of Pippin and the flames in Minas Tirith and thrust down his own dread.
 All went well that day, and no sight or sound had they of the enemy waiting to waylay them.
The Wild Men had put out a screen of wary hunters, so that no orc or roving spy should learn of the
movements in the hills. The light was more dim than ever as they drew nearer to the beleaguered
city, and the Riders passed in long files like dark shadows of men and horses. Each company was
guided by a wild woodman; but old Ghân walked beside the king. The start had been slower than
was hoped, for it had taken time for the Riders, walking and leading their horses, to find paths over
the thickly wooded ridges behind their camp and down into the hidden Stonewain Valley. It was
late in the afternoon when the leaders came to wide grey thickets stretching beyond the eastward
side of Amon Dîn, and masking a great gap in the line of hills that from Nardol to Dîn ran east and
west. Through the gap the forgotten wain-road long ago had run down, back into the main horseway
from the City through Anórien; but now for many lives of men trees had had their way with it,
and it had vanished, broken and buried under the leaves of uncounted years. But the thickets
offered to the Riders their last hope of cover before they went into open battle; for beyond them lay
the road and the plains of Anduin, while east and southwards the slopes were bare and rocky, as the
writhen hills gathered themselves together and climbed up, bastion upon bastion, into the great
mass and shoulders of Mindolluin.
 The leading company was halted, and as those behind filed up out of the trough of the
Stonewain Valley they spread out and passed to camping-places under the grey trees. The king
summoned the captains to council. Éomer sent out scouts to spy upon the road; but old Ghân shook
his head.
 'No good to send Horse-men,' he said. 'Wild Men have already seen all that can be seen in the
bad air. They will come soon and speak to me here.'
 The captains came; and then out of the trees crept warily other púkel-shapes so like old Ghân
that Merry could hardly tell them apart. They spoke to Ghân in a strange throaty language.
 Presently Ghân turned to the king. 'Wild Men say many things ' he said. 'First, be wary! Still
many men in camp beyond Dîn, an hour's walk yonder,' he waved his arm west towards the black
beacon. 'But none to see between here and Stone-folk's new walls. Many busy there. Walls stand up
no longer: _gorgûn_ knock them down with earth-thunder and with clubs of black iron. They are
unwary and do not look about them. They think their friends watch all roads!' At that old Ghân
made a curious gurgling noise, and it seemed that he was laughing.
 'Good tidings!' cried Éomer. 'Even in this gloom hope gleams again. Our Enemy's devices oft
serve us in his despite. The accursed darkness itself has been a cloak to us. And now, lusting to
destroy Gondor and throw it down stone from stone, his orcs have taken away my greatest fear. The
out-wall could have been held long against us. Now we can sweep through – if once we win so far.'
 'Once again I thank you, Ghân-buri-Ghân of the woods,' said Théoden. 'Good fortune go with
you for tidings and for guidance!'
 'Kill _gorgûn_! Kill orc-folk! No other words please Wild Men ' answered Ghân. 'Drive away
bad air and darkness with bright iron!'
 'To do these things we have ridden far,' said the king, 'and we shall attempt them. But what we
shall achieve only tomorrow will show.'
 Ghân-buri-Ghân squatted down and touched the earth with his horny brow in token of farewell.
Then he got up as if to depart. But suddenly he stood looking up like some startled woodland
animal snuffling a strange air. A light came in his eyes.
 'Wind is changing!' he cried, and with that, in a twinkling as it seemed, he and his fellows had
vanished into the glooms, never to be seen by any Rider of Rohan again. Not long after far away
eastward the faint drums throbbed again. Yet to no heart in all the host came any fear that the Wild
Men were unfaithful, strange and unlovely though they might appear.
 'We need no further guidance,' said Elfhelm; 'for there are riders in the host who have ridden
down to Mundburg in days of peace. I for one. When we come to the road it will veer south, and
there will lie before us still seven leagues ere we reach the wall of the townlands. Along most of
that way there is much grass on either side of the road. On that stretch the errand-riders of Gondor
reckoned to make their greatest speed. We may ride it swiftly and without great rumour.'
 'Then since we must look for fell deeds and the need of all our strength,' said Éomer, 'I counsel
that we rest now, and set out hence by night, and so time our going that we come upon the fields
when tomorrow is as light as it will be, or when our lord gives the signal.'
 To this the king assented, and the captains departed. But soon Elfhelm returned. 'The scouts
have found naught to report beyond the grey wood, lord,' he said, 'save two men only: two dead
men and two dead horses.'
 'Well?' said Éomer. 'What of it?'
 'This, lord: they were errand-riders of Gondor; Hirgon was one maybe. At least his hand still
clasped the Red Arrow, but his head was hewn off. And this also: it would seem by the signs that
they were fleeing _westward_ when they fell. As I read it, they found the enemy already on the outwall,
or assailing it, when they returned – and that would be two nights ago, if they used fresh
horses from the posts, as is their wont. They could not reach the City and turned back.'
 'Alas!' said Théoden. 'Then Denethor has heard no news of our riding and will despair of our
coming.'
 '_Need brooks no delay, yet late is better than never_,' said Éomer. 'And mayhap in this time
shall the old saw be proved truer than ever before since men spoke with mouth.'
 It was night. On either side of the road the host of Rohan was moving silently. Now the road
passing about the skirts of Mindolluin turned southward. Far away and almost straight ahead there
was a red glow under the black sky and the sides of the great mountain loomed dark against it.
They were drawing near the Rammas of the Pelennor; but the day was not yet come.
 The king rode in the midst of the leading company, his household-men about him. Elfhelm's
_éored_ came next; and now Merry noticed that Dernhelm had left his place and in the darkness
was moving steadily forward, until at last he was riding just in rear of the king's guard. There came
a check. Merry heard voices in front speaking softly. Out-riders had come back who had ventured
forward almost to the wall. They came to the king.
 'There are great fires, lord,' said one. 'The City is all set about with flame, and the field is full of
foes. But all seem drawn off to the assault. As well as we could guess, there are few left upon the
out-wall, and they are heedless, busy in destruction.'
 'Do you remember the Wild Man's words, lord?' said another. 'I live upon the open Wold in days
of peace; Wídfara is my name, and to me also the air brings messages. Already the wind is turning.
There comes a breath out of the South; there is a sea-tang in it, faint though it be. The morning will
bring new things. Above the reek it will be dawn when you pass the wall.'
 'If you speak truly, Wídfara, then may you live beyond this day in years of blessedness!' said
Théoden. He turned to the men of his household who were near, and he spoke now in a clear voice
so that many also of the riders of the first _éored_ heard him:
 'Now is the hour come, Riders of the Mark, sons of Eorl! Foes and fire are before you, and your
homes far behind. Yet, though you fight upon an alien field, the glory that you reap there shall be
your own for ever. Oaths ye have taken: now fulfil them all, to lord and land and league of
friendship!'
 Men clashed spear upon shield.
 'Éomer, my son! You lead the first _éored_,' said Théoden; 'and it shall go behind the king's
banner in the centre. Elfhelm, lead your company to the right when we pass the wall. And
Grimbold shall lead his towards the left. Let the other companies behind follow these three that
lead, as they have chance. Strike wherever the enemy gathers. Other plans we cannot make, for we
know not yet how things stand upon the field. Forth now, and fear no darkness!'
 The leading company rode off as swiftly as they could, for it was still deep dark, whatever
change Wídfara might forebode. Merry was riding behind Dernhelm, clutching with the left hand
while with the other he tried to loosen his sword in its sheath. He felt now bitterly the truth of the
old king's words: _in such a battle what would you do Meriadoc?_ Just this,' he thought: 'encumber
a rider, and hope at best to stay in my seat and not be pounded to death by galloping hoofs!'
 It was no more than a league to where the out-walls had stood. They soon reached them; too
soon for Merry. Wild cries broke out, and there was some clash of arms, but it was brief. The orcs
busy about the walls were few and amazed, and they were quickly slain or driven off. Before the
ruin of the north-gate in the Rammas the king halted again. The first _éored_ drew up behind him
and about him on either side. Dernhelm kept close to the king, though Elfhelm's company was
away on the right. Grimbold's men turned aside and passed round to a great gap in the wall further
eastward.
 Merry peered from behind Dernhelm's back. Far away, maybe ten miles or more, there was a
great burning, but between it and the Riders lines of fire blazed in a vast crescent, at the nearest
point less than a league distant. He could make out little more on the dark plain, and as yet he
neither saw any hope of morning, nor felt any wind, changed or unchanged.
 Now silently the host of Rohan moved forward into the field of Gondor, pouring in slowly but
steadily, like the rising tide through breaches in a dike that men have thought secure. But the mind
and will of the Black Captain were bent wholly on the falling city, and as yet no tidings came to
him warning that his designs held any flaw.
 After a while the king led his men away somewhat eastward, to come between the fires of the
siege and the outer fields. Still they were unchallenged, and still Théoden gave no signal. At last he
halted once again. The City was now nearer. A smell of burning was in the air and a very shadow
of death. The horses were uneasy. But the king sat upon Snowmane, motionless, gazing upon the
agony of Minas Tirith, as if stricken suddenly by anguish, or by dread. He seemed to shrink down,
cowed by age. Merry himself felt as if a great weight of horror and doubt had settled on him. His
heart beat slowly. Time seemed poised in uncertainty. They were too late! Too late was worse than
never! Perhaps Théoden would quail, bow his old head, turn, slink away to hide in the hills.
 Then suddenly Merry felt it at last, beyond doubt: a change. Wind was in his face! Light was
glimmering. Far, far away, in the South the clouds could be dimly seen as remote grey shapes,
rolling up, drifting: morning lay beyond them.
 But at that same moment there was a flash, as if lightning had sprung from the earth beneath the
City. For a searing second it stood dazzling far off in black and white, its topmost tower like a
glittering needle: and then as the darkness closed again there came rolling over the fields a great
_boom_.
 At that sound the bent shape of the king sprang suddenly erect. Tall and proud he seemed again;
and rising in his stirrups he cried in a loud voice, more clear than any there had ever heard a mortal
man achieve before:
 Arise, arise, Riders of Théoden!
 Fell deeds awake: fire and slaughter!
 spear shall be shaken, shield be splintered,
 a sword-day, a red day, ere the sun rises!
 Ride now, ride now! Ride to Gondor!
 With that he seized a great horn from Guthláf his banner-bearer, and he blew such a blast upon it
that it burst asunder. And straightway all the horns in the host were lifted up in music, and the
blowing of the horns of Rohan in that hour was like a storm upon the plain and a thunder in the
mountains.
 Ride now, ride now! Ride to Gondor!
 Suddenly the king cried to Snowmane and the horse sprang away. Behind him his banner blew
in the wind, white horse upon a field of green, but he outpaced it. After him thundered the knights
of his house, but he was ever before them. Éomer rode there, the white horsetail on his helm
floating in his speed, and the front of the first _éored_ roared like a breaker foaming to the shore,
but Théoden could not be overtaken. Fey he seemed, or the battle-fury of his fathers ran like new
tire in his veins, and he was borne up on Snowmane like a god of old, even as Oromë the Great in
the battle of the Valar when the world was young. His golden shield was uncovered, and lo! it
shone like an image of the Sun, and the grass flamed into green about the white feet of his steed.
For morning came, morning and a wind from the sea; and the darkness was removed, and the hosts
of Mordor wailed, and terror took them, and they fled, and died, and the hoofs of wrath rode over
them. And then all the host of Rohan burst into song, and they sang as they slew, for the joy of
battle was on them, and the sound of their singing that was fair and terrible came even to the City.
 _Chapter 6_
 The Battle of the Pelennor Fields
 But it was no orc-chieftain or brigand that led the assault upon Gondor. The darkness was
breaking too soon, before the date that his Master had set for it: fortune had betrayed him for the
moment, and the world had turned against him; victory was slipping from his grasp even as he
stretched out his hand to seize it. But his arm was long. He was still in command, wielding great
powers. King, Ringwraith, Lord of the Nazgûl, he had many weapons. He left the Gate and
vanished.
 Théoden King of the Mark had reached the road from the Gate to the River, and he turned
towards the City that was now less than a mile distant. He slackened his speed a little, seeking new
foes, and his knights came about him, and Dernhelm was with them. Ahead nearer the walls
Elfhelm's men were among the siege-engines, hewing, slaying, driving their foes into the fire-pits.
Well nigh all the northern half of the Pelennor was overrun, and there camps were blazing, orcs
were flying towards the River like herds before the hunters; and the Rohirrim went hither and
thither at their will. But they had not yet overthrown the siege, nor won the Gate. Many foes stood
before it, and on the further half of the plain were other hosts still unfought. Southward beyond the
road lay the main force of the Haradrim, and there their horsemen were gathered about the standard
of their chieftain. And he looked out, and in the growing light he saw the banner of the king, and
that it was far ahead of the battle with few men about it. Then he was filled with a red wrath and
shouted aloud, and displaying his standard, black serpent upon scarlet, he came against the white
horse and the green with great press of men; and the drawing of the scimitars of the Southrons was
like a glitter of stars.
 Then Théoden was aware of him, and would not wait for his onset, but crying to Snowmane he
charged headlong to greet him. Great was the clash of their meeting. But the white fury of the
Northmen burned the hotter, and more skilled was their knighthood with long spears and bitter.
Fewer were they but they clove through the Southrons like a fire-bolt in a forest. Right through the
press drove Théoden Thengel's son, and his spear was shivered as he threw down their chieftain.
Out swept his sword, and he spurred to the standard, hewed staff and bearer; and the black serpent
foundered. Then all that was left unslain of their cavalry turned and fled far away.
 But lo! suddenly in the midst of the glory of the king his golden shield was dimmed. The new
morning was blotted from the sky. Dark fell about him. Horses reared and screamed. Men cast from
the saddle lay grovelling on the ground.
 'To me! To me!' cried Théoden. 'Up Eorlingas! Fear no darkness!' But Snowmane wild with
terror stood up on high, fighting with the air, and then with a great scream he crashed upon his side:
a black dart had pierced him. The king fell beneath him.
 The great shadow descended like a falling cloud. And behold! it was a winged creature: if bird,
then greater than all other birds, and it was naked, and neither quill nor feather did it bear, and its
vast pinions were as webs of hide between horned fingers; and it stank. A creature of an older
world maybe it was, whose kind, fingering in forgotten mountains cold beneath the Moon,
outstayed their day, and in hideous eyrie bred this last untimely brood, apt to evil. And the Dark
Lord took it, and nursed it with fell meats, until it grew beyond the measure of all other things that
fly; and he gave it to his servant to be his steed. Down, down it came, and then, folding its fingered
webs, it gave a croaking cry, and settled upon the body of Snowmane, digging in its claws,
stooping its long naked neck.
 Upon it sat a shape, black-mantled, huge and threatening. A crown of steel he bore, but between
rim and robe naught was there to see, save only a deadly gleam of eyes: the Lord of the Nazgûl. To
the air he had returned, summoning his steed ere the darkness failed, and now he was come again,
bringing ruin, turning hope to despair, and victory to death. A great black mace he wielded.
 But Théoden was not utterly forsaken. The knights of his house lay slain about him, or else
mastered by the madness of their steeds were borne far away. Yet one stood there still: Dernhelm
the young, faithful beyond fear; and he wept, for he had loved his lord as a father. Right through the
charge Merry had been borne unharmed behind him, until the Shadow came; and then Windfola
had thrown them in his terror, and now ran wild upon the plain. Merry crawled on all fours like a
dazed beast, and such a horror was on him that he was blind and sick.
 'King's man! King's man!' his heart cried within him. 'You must stay by him. As a father you
shall be to me, you said.' But his will made no answer, and his body shook. He dared not open his
eyes or look up.
 Then out of the blackness in his mind he thought that he heard Dernhelm speaking; yet now the
voice seemed strange, recalling some other voice that he had known.
 'Begone, foul dwimmerlaik, lord of carrion! Leave the dead in peace!'
 A cold voice answered: 'Come not between the Nazgûl and his prey! Or he will not slay thee in
thy turn. He will bear thee away to the houses of lamentation, beyond all darkness, where thy flesh
shall be devoured, and thy shrivelled mind be left naked to the Lidless Eye.'
 A sword rang as it was drawn. 'Do what you will; but I will hinder it, if I may.'
 'Hinder me? Thou fool. No living man may hinder me!'
 Then Merry heard of all sounds in that hour the strangest. It seemed that Dernhelm laughed, and
the clear voice was like the ring of steel. 'But no living man am I! You look upon a woman. Éowyn
I am, Éomund's daughter. You stand between me and my lord and kin. Begone, if you be not
deathless! For living or dark undead, I will smite you, if you touch him.'
 The winged creature screamed at her, but the Ringwraith made no answer, and was silent, as if
in sudden doubt. Very amazement for a moment conquered Merry's fear. He opened his eyes and
the blackness was lifted from them. There some paces from him sat the great beast, and all seemed
dark about it, and above it loomed the Nazgûl Lord like a shadow of despair. A little to the left
facing them stood she whom he had called Dernhelm. But the helm of her secrecy, had fallen from
her, and her bright hair, released from its bonds, gleamed with pale gold upon her shoulders. Her
eyes grey as the sea were hard and fell, and yet tears were on her cheek. A sword was in her hand,
and she raised her shield against the horror of her enemy's eyes.
 Éowyn it was, and Dernhelm also. For into Merry's mind flashed the memory of the face that he
saw at the riding from Dunharrow: the face of one that goes seeking death, having no hope. Pity
filled his heart and great wonder, and suddenly the slow-kindled courage of his race awoke. He
clenched his hand. She should not die, so fair, so desperate At least she should not die alone,
unaided.
 The face of their enemy was not turned towards him, but still he hardly dared to move, dreading
lest the deadly eyes should fall on him. Slowly, slowly he began to crawl aside; but the Black
Captain, in doubt and malice intent upon the woman before him, heeded him no more than a worm
in the mud.
 Suddenly the great beast beat its hideous wings, and the wind of them was foul. Again it leaped
into the air, and then swiftly fell down upon Éowyn, shrieking, striking with beak and claw.
 Still she did not blench: maiden of the Rohirrim, child of kings, slender but as a steel-blade, fair
but terrible. A swift stroke she dealt, skilled and deadly. The outstretched neck she clove asunder,
and the hewn head fell like a stone. Backward she sprang as the huge shape crashed to ruin, vast
wings outspread, crumpled on the earth; and with its fall the shadow passed away. A light fell about
her, and her hair shone in the sunrise.
 Out of the wreck rose the Black Rider, tall and threatening, towering above her. With a cry of
hatred that stung the very ears like venom he let fall his mace. Her shield was shivered in many
pieces, and her arm was broken; she stumbled to her knees. He bent over her like a cloud, and his
eyes glittered; he raised his mace to kill.
 But suddenly he too stumbled forward with a cry of bitter pain, and his stroke went wide,
driving into the ground. Merry's sword had stabbed him from behind, shearing through the black
mantle, and passing up beneath the hauberk had pierced the sinew behind his mighty knee.
 'Éowyn! Éowyn!' cried Merry. Then tottering, struggling up, with her last strength she drove her
sword between crown and mantle, as the great shoulders bowed before her. The sword broke
sparkling into many shards. The crown rolled away with a clang. Éowyn fell forward upon her
fallen foe. But lo! the mantle and hauberk were empty. Shapeless they lay now on the ground, torn
and tumbled; and a cry went up into the shuddering air, and faded to a shrill wailing, passing with
the wind, a voice bodiless and thin that died, and was swallowed up, and was never heard again in
that age of this world.
 And there stood Meriadoc the hobbit in the midst of the slain, blinking like an owl in the
daylight, for tears blinded him; and through a mist he looked on Éowyn's fair head, as she lay and
did not move; and he looked on the face of the king, fallen in the midst of his glory, For Snowmane
in his agony had rolled away from him again; yet he was the bane of his master.
 Then Merry stooped and lifted his hand to kiss it, and lo! Théoden opened his eyes, and they
were clear, and he spoke in a quiet voice though laboured.
 'Farewell, Master Holbytla!' he said. 'My body is broken. I go to my fathers. And even in their
mighty company I shall not now be ashamed. I felled the black serpent. A grim morn, and a glad
day, and a golden sunset!'
 Merry could not speak, but wept anew. 'Forgive me, lord,' he said at last, 'if I broke your
command, and yet have done no more in your service than to weep at our parting.'
 The old king smiled. 'Grieve not! It is forgiven. Great heart will not be denied. Live now in
blessedness; and when you sit in peace with your pipe, think of me! For never now shall I sit with
you in Meduseld, as I promised, or listen to your herb-lore.' He closed his eyes, and Merry bowed
beside him. Presently he spoke again. 'Where is Éomer? For my eyes darken, and I would see him
ere I go. He must be king after me. And I would send word to Éowyn. She, she would not have me
leave her, and now I shall not see her again, dearer than daughter.'
 'Lord, lord,' began Merry brokenly, 'she is-'; but at that moment there was a great clamour, and
all about them horns and trumpets were blowing. Merry looked round: he had forgotten the war,
and all the world beside, and many hours it seemed since the king rode to his fall, though in truth it
was only a little while. But now he saw that they were in danger of being caught in the very midst
of the great battle that would soon be joined.
 New forces of the enemy were hastening up the road from the River; and from under the walls
came the legions of Morgul; and from the southward fields came footmen of Harad with horsemen
before them, and behind them rose the huge backs of the _mûmakil_ with war-towers upon them.
But northward the white crest of Éomer led the great front of the Rohirrim which he had again
gathered and marshalled; and out of the City came all the strength of men that was in it, and the
silver swan of Dol Amroth was borne in the van, driving the enemy from the Gate.
 For a moment the thought flitted through Merry's mind: 'Where is Gandalf? Is he not here?
Could he not have saved the king and Éowyn?' But thereupon Éomer rode up in haste, and with him
came the knights of the household that still lived and had now mastered their horses. They looked
in wonder at the carcase of the fell beast that lay there: and their steeds would not go near. But
Éomer leaped from the saddle, and grief and dismay fell upon him as he came to the king's side and
stood there in silence.
 Then one of the knights took the king's banner from the hand of Guthláf the banner-bearer who
lay dead, and he lifted it up. Slowly Théoden opened his eyes. Seeing the banner he made a sign
that it should be given to Éomer.
 'Hail, King of the Mark!' he said. 'Ride now to victory! Bid Éowyn farewell!' And so he died,
and knew not that Éowyn lay near him. And those who stood by wept, crying: 'Théoden King!
Théoden King!'
 But Éomer said to them:
 Mourn not overmuch! Mighty was the fallen,
 meet was his ending. When his mound is raised,
 women then shall weep. War now calls us!
 Yet he himself wept as he spoke. 'Let his knights remain here,' he said; 'and bear his body in
honour from the field, lest the battle ride over it! Yea, and all these other of the king's men that lie
here.' And he looked at the slain, recalling their names. Then suddenly he beheld his sister Éowyn
as she lay, and he knew her. He stood a moment as a man who is pierced in the midst of a cry by an
arrow through the heart; and then his face went deathly white; and a cold fury rose in him, so that
all speech failed him for a while. A fey mood took him.
 'Éowyn, Éowyn!' he cried at last: 'Éowyn, how come you here? What madness or devilry is this?
Death, death, death! Death take us all!'
 Then without taking counsel or waiting for the approach of the men of the City, he spurred
headlong back to the front of the great host, and blew a horn, and cried aloud for the onset. Over
the field rang his clear voice calling: 'Death! Ride, ride to ruin and the world's ending!'
 And with that the host began to move. But the Rohirrim sang no more. _Death_ they cried with
one voice loud and terrible, and gathering speed like a great tide their battle swept about their fallen
king and passed, roaring away southwards.
 And still Meriadoc the hobbit stood there blinking through his tears and no one spoke to him,
indeed none seemed to heed him. He brushed away the tears, and stooped to pick up the green
shield that Éowyn had given him; and he slung it at his back. Then he looked for his sword that he
had let fall; for even as he struck his blow his arm was numbed, and now he could only use his left
hand. And behold! there lay his weapon, but the blade was smoking like a dry branch that has been
thrust in a fire; and as he watched it, it writhed and withered and was consumed.
 So passed the sword of the Barrow-downs, work of Westernesse. But glad would he have been
to know its fate who wrought it slowly long ago in the North-kingdom when the Dúnedain were
young, and chief among their foes was the dread realm of Angmar and its sorcerer king. No other
blade, not though mightier hands had wielded it, would have dealt that foe a wound so bitter,
cleaving the undead flesh, breaking the spell that knit his unseen sinews to his will.
 Men now raised the king, and laying cloaks upon spear-truncheons they made shift to bear him
away towards the City; and others lifted Éowyn gently up and bore her after him. But the men of
the king's household they could not yet bring from the field; for seven of the king's knights had
fallen there, and Déorwine their chief was among them. So they laid them apart from their foes and
the fell beast and set spears about them. And afterwards when all was over men returned and made
a fire there and burned the carcase of the beast; but for Snowmane they dug a grave and set up a
stone upon which was carved in the tongues of Gondor and the Mark:
 Faithful servant yet master's bane
 Lightfoot's foal, swift Snowmane.
 Green and long grew the grass on Snowmane's Howe, but ever black and bare was the ground
where the beast was burned.
 Now slowly and sadly Merry walked beside the bearers, and he gave no more heed to the battle.
He was weary and full of pain, and his limbs trembled as with a chill. A great rain came out of the
Sea, and it seemed that all things wept for Théoden and Éowyn, quenching the fires in the City with
grey tears. It was through a mist that presently he saw the van of the men of Gondor approaching.
Imrahil, Prince of Dol Amroth, rode up and drew rein before them.
 'What burden do you bear, Men of Rohan?' he cried.
 'Théoden King,' they answered. 'He is dead. But Éomer King now rides in the battle: he with the
white crest in the wind.'
 Then the prince went from his horse, and knelt by the bier in honour of the king and his great
onset; and he wept. And rising he looked then on Éowyn and was amazed. 'Surely, here is a
woman?' he said. 'Have even the women of the Rohirrim come to war in our need?'
 'Nay! One only,' they answered. 'The Lady Éowyn is she, sister of Éomer; and we knew naught
of her riding until this hour, and greatly we rue it.'
 Then the prince seeing her beauty, though her face was pale and cold, touched her hand as he
bent to look more closely on her. 'Men of Rohan!' he cried. 'Are there no leeches among you? She
is hurt to the death maybe, but I deem that she yet lives.' And he held the bright-burnished
vambrace that was upon his arm before her cold tips, and behold! a little mist was laid on it hardly
to be seen.
 'Haste now is needed,' he said, and he sent one riding back swiftly to the City to bring aid. But
he bowing low to the fallen, bade them farewell, and mounting rode away into battle.
 And now the fighting waxed furious on the fields of the Pelennor; and the din of arms rose upon
high, with the crying of men and the neighing of horses. Horns were blown and trumpets were
braying, and the _mûmakil_ were bellowing as they were goaded to war. Under the south walls of
the City the footmen of Gondor now drove against the legions of Morgul that were still gathered
there in strength. But the horsemen rode eastward to the succour of Éomer: Húrin the Tall Warden
of the Keys, and the Lord of Lossarnach, and Hirluin of the Green Hills, and Prince Imrahil the fair
with his knights all about him.
 Not too soon came their aid to the Rohirrim; for fortune had turned against Éomer, and his fury
had betrayed him. The great wrath of his onset had utterly overthrown the front of his enemies, and
great wedges of his Riders had passed clear through the ranks of the Southrons, discomfiting their
horsemen and riding their footmen to ruin. But wherever the _mûmakil_ came there the horses
would not go, but blenched and swerved away; and the great monsters were unfought, and stood
like towers of defence, and the Haradrim rallied about them. And if the Rohirrim at their onset were
thrice outnumbered by the Haradrim alone, soon their case became worse; for new strength came
now streaming to the field out of Osgiliath. There they had been mustered for the sack of the City
and the rape of Gondor, waiting on the call of their Captain. He now was destroyed; but Gothmog
the lieutenant of Morgul had flung them into the fray; Easterlings with axes, and Variags of Khand.
Southrons in scarlet, and out of Far Harad black men like half-trolls with white eyes and red
tongues. Some now hastened up behind the Rohirrim, others held westward to hold off the forces of
Gondor and prevent their joining with Rohan.
 It was even as the day thus began to turn against Gondor and their hope wavered that a new cry
went up in the City, it being then midmorning, and a great wind blowing, and the rain flying north,
and the sun shining. In that clear air watchmen on the walls saw afar a new sight of fear, and their
last hope left them.
 For Anduin, from the bend at the Harlond, so flowed that from the City men could look down it
lengthwise for some leagues, and the far-sighted could see any ships that approached. And looking
thither they cried in dismay; for black against the glittering stream they beheld a fleet borne up on
the wind: dromunds, and ships of great draught with many oars, and with black sails bellying in the
breeze.
 'The Corsairs of Umbar!' men shouted. 'The Corsairs of Umbar! Look! The Corsairs of Umbar
are coming! So Belfalas is taken, and the Ethir, and Lebennin is gone. The Corsairs are upon us! It
is the last stroke of doom!'
 And some without order, for none could he found to command them in the City, ran to the bells
and tolled the alarm; and some blew the trumpets sounding the retreat. 'Back to the walls!' they
cried. 'Back to the walls! Come back to the City before all are overwhelmed!' But the wind that
sped the ships blew all their clamour away.
 The Rohirrim indeed had no need of news or alarm. All too well they could see for themselves
the black sails. For Éomer was now scarcely a mile from the Harlond, and a great press of his first
foes was between him and the haven there, while new foes came swirling behind, cutting him off
from the Prince. Now he looked to the River, and hope died in his heart, and the wind that he had
blessed he now called accursed. But the hosts of Mordor were enheartened, and filled with a new
lust and fury they came yelling to the onset.
 Stern now was Éomer's mood, and his mind clear again. He let blow the horns to rally all men to
his banner that could come thither; for he thought to make a great shield-wall at the last, and stand,
and fight there on foot till all fell, and do deeds of song on the fields of Pelennor, though no man
should be left in the West to remember the last King of the Mark. So he rode to a green hillock and
there set his banner, and the White Horse ran rippling in the wind.
 Out of doubt, out of dark to the day's rising
 I came singing in the sun, sword unsheathing.
 To hope's end I rode and to heart's breaking:
 Now for wrath, now for ruin and a red nightfall!
 These staves he spoke, yet he laughed as he said them. For once more lust of battle was on him;
and he was still unscathed, and he was young, and he was king: the lord of a fell people. And lo!
even as he laughed at despair he looked out again on the black ships, and he lifted up his sword to
defy them.
 And then wonder took him, and a great joy; and he cast his sword up in the sunlight and sang as
he caught it. And all eyes followed his gaze, and behold! upon the foremost ship a great standard
broke, and the wind displayed it as she turned towards the Harlond. There flowered a White Tree,
and that was for Gondor; but Seven Stars were about it, and a high crown above it, the signs of
Elendil that no lord had borne for years beyond count. And the stars flamed in the sunlight, for they
were wrought of gems by Arwen daughter of Elrond; and the crown was bright in the morning, for
it was wrought of mithril and gold.
 Thus came Aragorn son of Arathorn, Elessar, Isildur's heir, out of the Paths of the Dead, borne
upon a wind from the Sea to the kingdom of Gondor; and the mirth of the Rohirrim was a torrent of
laughter and a flashing of swords, and the joy and wonder of the City was a music of trumpets and
a ringing of bells. But the hosts of Mordor were seized with bewilderment, and a great wizardry it
seemed to them that their own ships should be filled with their foes; and a black dread fell on them,
knowing that the tides of fate had turned against them and their doom was at hand.
 East rode the knights of Dol Amroth driving the enemy before them: troll-men and Variags and
orcs that hated the sunlight. South strode Éomer and men fled before his face, and they were caught
between the hammer and the anvil. For now men leaped from the ships to the quays of the Harlond
and swept north like a storm. There came Legolas, and Gimli wielding his axe, and Halbarad with
the standard, and Elladan and Elrohir with stars on their brow, and the dour-handed Dúnedain,
Rangers of the North, leading a great valour of the folk of Lebennin and Lamedon and the fiefs of
the South. But before all went Aragorn with the Flame of the West, Andúril like a new fire kindled,
Narsil re-forged as deadly as of old: and upon his brow was the Star of Elendil.
 And so at length Éomer and Aragorn met in the midst of the battle, and they leaned on their
swords and looked on one another and were glad.
 'Thus we meet again, though all the hosts of Mordor lay between us,' said Aragorn. 'Did I not
say so at the Hornburg?'
 'So you spoke,' said Éomer, 'but hope oft deceives, and I knew not then that you were a man
foresighted. Yet twice blessed is help unlooked for, and never was a meeting of friends more
joyful.' And they clasped hand in hand. 'Nor indeed more timely,' said Éomer. 'You come none too
soon, my friend. Much loss and sorrow has befallen us.'
 'Then let us avenge it, ere we speak of it!' said Aragorn, and they rode back to battle together.
 Hard fighting and long labour they had still; for the Southrons were bold men and grim, and
fierce in despair; and the Easterlings were strong and war-hardened and asked for no quarter. And
so in this place and that, by burned homestead or barn, upon hillock or mound, under wall or on
field, still they gathered and rallied and fought until the day wore away.
 Then the Sun went at last behind Mindolluin and filled all the sky with a great burning, so that
the hills and the mountains were dyed as with blood; fire glowed in the River, and the grass of the
Pelennor lay red in the nightfall. And in that hour the great Battle of the field of Gondor was over;
and not one living foe was left within the circuit of the Rammas. All were slain save those who fled
to die, or to drown in the red foam of the River. Few ever came eastward to Morgul or Mordor; and
to the land of the Haradrim came only a tale from far off: a rumour of the wrath and terror of
Gondor.
 Aragorn and Éomer and Imrahil rode back towards the Gate of the City, and they were now
weary beyond joy or sorrow. These three were unscathed, for such was their fortune and the skill
and might of their arms, and few indeed had dared to abide them or look on their faces in the hour
of their wrath. But many others were hurt or maimed or dead upon the field. The axes hewed
Forlong as he fought alone and unhorsed; and both Duilin of Morthond and his brother were
trampled to death when they assailed the _mûmakil_, leading their bowmen close to shoot at the
eyes of the monsters. Neither Hirluin the fair would return to Pinnath Gelin, nor Grimbold to
Grimslade, nor Halbarad to the Northlands, dour-handed Ranger. No few had fallen, renowned or
nameless, captain or soldier; for it was a great battle and the full count of it no tale has told. So long
afterward a maker in Rohan said in his song of the Mounds of Mundburg:
 We heard of the horns in the hills ringing,
 the swords shining in the South-kingdom.
 Steeds went striding to the Stoningland
 as wind in the morning. War was kindled.
 There Théoden fell, Thengling mighty,
 to his golden halls and green pastures
 in the Northern fields never returning,
 high lord of the host. Harding and Guthláf
 Dúnhere and Déorwine, doughty Grimbold,
 Herefara and Herubrand, Horn and Fastred,
 fought and fell there in a far country:
 in the Mounds of Mundburg under mould they lie
 with their league-fellows, lords of Gondor.
 Neither Hirluin the Fair to the hills by the sea,
 nor Forlong the old to the flowering vales
 ever, to Arnach, to his own country
 returned in triumph; nor the tall bowmen,
 Derufin and Duilin, to their dark waters,
 meres of Morthond under mountain-shadows.
 Death in the morning and at day's ending
 lords took and lowly. Long now they sleep
 under grass in Gondor by the Great River.
 Grey now as tears, gleaming silver,
 red then it rolled, roaring water:
 foam dyed with blood flamed at sunset;
 as beacons mountains burned at evening;
 red fell the dew in Rammas Echor.
 _Chapter 7_
 The Pyre of Denethor
 When the dark shadow at the Gate withdrew Gandalf still sat motionless. But Pippin rose to his
feet, as if a great weight had been lifted from him; and he stood listening to the horns, and it
seemed to him that they would break his heart with joy. And never in after years could he hear a
horn blown in the distance without tears starting in his eyes. But now suddenly his errand returned
to his memory, and he ran forward. At that moment Gandalf stirred and spoke to Shadowfax, and
was about to ride through the Gate.
 'Gandalf, Gandalf! ' cried Pippin, and Shadowfax halted.
 'What are you doing here?' said Gandalf. 'Is it not a law in the City that those who wear the
black and silver must stay in the Citadel, unless their lord gives them leave?'
 'He has,' said Pippin. 'He sent me away. But I am frightened. Something terrible may happen up
there. The Lord is out of his mind, I think. I am afraid he will kill himself, and kill Faramir too.
Can't you do something?'
 Gandalf looked through the gaping Gate, and already on the fields he heard the gathering sound
of battle. He clenched his hand. 'I must go ' he said. 'The Black Rider is abroad, and he will yet
bring ruin on us. I have no time.'
 'But Faramir!' cried Pippin. 'He is not dead, and they will burn him alive, if someone does not
stop them.'
 'Burn him alive?' said Gandalf. 'What is this tale? Be quick!'
 'Denethor has gone to the Tombs,' said Pippin, 'and he has taken Faramir, and he says we are all
to burn, and he will not wait, and they are to make a pyre and burn him on it, and Faramir as well.
And he has sent men to fetch wood and oil. And I have told Beregond, but I'm afraid he won't dare
to leave his post: he is on guard. And what can he do anyway?' So Pippin poured out his tale,
reaching up and touching Gandalf's knee with trembling hands. 'Can't you save Faramir?'
 'Maybe I can,' said Gandalf; 'but if I do, then others will die, I fear. Well, I must come, since no
other help can reach him. But evil and sorrow will come of this. Even in the heart of our stronghold
the Enemy has power to strike us: for his will it is that is at work.'
 Then having made up his mind he acted swiftly; and catching up Pippin and setting him before
him, he turned Shadowfax with a word. Up the climbing streets of Minas Tirith they clattered,
while the noise of war rose behind them. Everywhere men were rising from their despair and dread,
seizing their weapons, crying one to another: 'Rohan has come!' Captains were shouting, companies
were mustering; many already were marching down to the Gate.
 They met the Prince Imrahil, and he called to them: 'Whither now, Mithrandir? The Rohirrim are
fighting on the fields of Gondor! We must gather all the strength that we can find.'
 'You will need every man and more,' said Gandalf. 'Make all haste. I will come when I can. But
I have an errand to the Lord Denethor that will not wait. Take command in the Lord's absence!'
 They passed on; and as they climbed and drew near to the Citadel they felt the wind blowing in
their faces, and they caught the glimmer of morning far away, a light growing in the southern sky.
But it brought little hope to them, not knowing what evil lay before them, fearing to come too late.
 'Darkness is passing,' said Gandalf, 'but it still lies heavy on this City.'
 At the gate of the Citadel they found no guard. 'Then Beregond has gone,' said Pippin more
hopefully. They turned away and hastened along the road to the Closed Door. It stood wide open,
and the porter lay before it. He was slain and his key had been taken.
 'Work of the Enemy!' said Gandalf. 'Such deeds he loves: friend at war with friend; loyalty
divided in confusion of hearts.' Now he dismounted and bade Shadowfax return to his stable. 'For,
my friend,' he said, 'you and I should have ridden to the fields long ago, but other matters delay me.
Yet come swiftly if I call!'
 They passed the Door and walked on down the steep winding road. Light was growing, and the
tall columns and carven figures beside the way went slowly by like grey ghosts.
 Suddenly the silence was broken, and they heard below them cries and the ringing of swords:
such sounds as had not been heard in the hallowed places since the building of the City. At last they
came to Rath Dínen and hastened towards the House of the Stewards, looming in the twilight under
its great dome.
 'Stay! Stay!' cried Gandalf, springing forward to the stone stair before the door. 'Stay this
madness!'
 For there were the servants of Denethor with swords and torches in their hands; but alone in the
porch upon the topmost step stood Beregond, clad in the black and silver of the Guard; and he held
the door against them. Two of them had already fallen to his sword, staining the hallows with their
blood; and the others cursed him, calling him outlaw and traitor to his master.
 Even as Gandalf and Pippin ran forward, they heard from within the house of the dead the voice
of Denethor crying: 'Haste, haste! Do as I have bidden! Slay me this renegade! Or must I do so
myself?' Thereupon the door which Beregond held shut with his left hand was wrenched open, and
there behind him stood the Lord of the City, tall and fell; a light like flame was in his eyes, and he
held a drawn sword.
 But Gandalf sprang up the steps, and the men fell back from him and covered their eyes; for his
coming was like the incoming of a white light into a dark place, and he came with great anger. He
lifted up his hand, and in the very stroke, the sword of Denethor flew up and left his grasp and fell
behind him in the shadows of the house; and Denethor stepped backward before Gandalf as one
amazed.
 'What is this, my lord?' said the wizard. 'The houses of the dead are no places for the living. And
why do men fight here in the Hallows when there is war enough before the Gate? Or has our
Enemy come even to Rath Dínen?'
 'Since when has the Lord of Gondor been answerable to thee?' said Denethor. 'Or may I not
command my own servants?'
 'You may,' said Gandalf. 'But others may contest your will, when it is turned to madness and
evil. Where is your son, Faramir?'
 'He lies within,' said Denethor, 'burning, already burning. They have set a fire in his flesh. But
soon all shall be burned. The West has failed. It shall all go up in a great fire, and all shall be ended.
Ash! Ash and smoke blown away on the wind!'
 Then Gandalf seeing the madness that was on him feared that he had already done some evil
deed, and he thrust forward, with Beregond and Pippin behind him, while Denethor gave back until
he stood beside the table within. But there they found Faramir, still dreaming in his fever, lying
upon the table. Wood was piled under it, and high all about it, and all was drenched with oil, even
the garments of Faramir and the coverlets; but as yet no fire had been set to the fuel. Then Gandalf
revealed the strength that lay hid in him; even as the light of his power was hidden under his grey
mantle. He leaped up on to the faggots, and raising the sick man lightly he sprang down again, and
bore him towards the door. But as he did so Faramir moaned and called on his father in his dream.
 Denethor started as one waking from a trance, and the flame died in his eyes, and he wept; and
he said: 'Do not take my son from me! He calls for me.'
 'He calls,' said Gandalf, 'but you cannot come to him yet. For he must seek healing on the
threshold of death, and maybe find it not. Whereas your part is to go out to the battle of your City,
where maybe death awaits you. This you know in your heart.'
 'He will not wake again,' said Denethor. 'Battle is vain. Why should we wish to live longer?
Why should we not go to death side by side?'
 'Authority is not given to you, Steward of Gondor, to order the hour of your death,' answered
Gandalf. 'And only the heathen kings, under the domination of the Dark Power, did thus, slaying
themselves in pride and despair, murdering their kin to ease their own death.' Then passing through
the door he took Faramir from the deadly house and laid him on the bier on which he had been
brought, and which had now been set in the porch. Denethor followed him, and stood trembling,
looking with longing on the face of his son. And for a moment, while all were silent and still,
watching the Lord in his throes, he wavered.
 'Come!' said Gandalf. 'We are needed. There is much that you can yet do.'
 Then suddenly Denethor laughed. He stood up tall and proud again, and stepping swiftly back to
the table he lifted from it the pillow on which his head had lain. Then coming to the doorway he
drew aside the covering, and lo! he had between his hands a _palantír_. And as he held it up, it
seemed to those that looked on that the globe began to glow with an inner flame, so that the lean
face of the Lord was lit as with a red fire, and it seemed cut out of hard stone, sharp with black
shadows, noble, proud, and terrible. His eyes glittered.
 'Pride and despair!' he cried. 'Didst thou think that the eyes of the White Tower were blind? Nay,
I have seen more than thou knowest, Grey Fool. For thy hope is but ignorance. Go then and labour
in healing! Go forth and fight! Vanity. For a little space you may triumph on the field, for a day.
But against the Power that now arises there is no victory. To this City only the first finger of its
hand has yet been stretched. All the East is moving. And even now the wind of thy hope cheats thee
and wafts up Anduin a fleet with black sails. The West has failed. It is time for all to depart who
would not be slaves.'
 'Such counsels will make the Enemy's victory certain indeed,' said Gandalf.
 'Hope on then!' laughed Denethor. 'Do I not know thee, Mithrandir? Thy hope is to rule in my
stead, to stand behind every throne, north, south, or west. I have read thy mind and its policies. Do I
not know that you commanded this halfling here to keep silence? That you brought him hither to be
a spy within my very chamber? And yet in our speech together I have learned the names and
purpose of all thy companions. So! With the left hand thou wouldst use me for a little while as a
shield against Mordor, and with the right bring up this Ranger of the North to supplant me.
 'But I say to thee, Gandalf Mithrandir, I will not be thy tool! I am Steward of the House of
Anárion. I will not step down to be the dotard chamberlain of an upstart. Even were his claim
proved to me, still he comes but of the line of Isildur. I will not bow to such a one, last of a ragged
house long bereft of lordship and dignity.'
 'What then would you have,' said Gandalf, 'if your will could have its way?'
 'I would have things as they were in all the days of my life,' answered Denethor, 'and in the days
of my longfathers before me: to be the Lord of this City in peace, and leave my chair to a son after
me, who would be his own master and no wizard's pupil. But if doom denies this to me, then I will
have _naught_: neither life diminished, nor love halved, nor honour abated.'
 'To me it would not seem that a Steward who faithfully surrenders his charge is diminished in
love or in honour,' said Gandalf. 'And at the least you shall not rob your son of his choice while his
death is still in doubt.'
 At those words Denethor's eyes flamed again, and taking the Stone under his arm he drew a
knife and strode towards the bier. But Beregond sprang forward and set himself before Faramir.
 'So!' cried Denethor. 'Thou hadst already stolen half my son's love. Now thou stealest the hearts
of my knights also, so that they rob me wholly of my son at the last. But in this at least thou shalt
not defy my will: to rule my own end.'
 'Come hither!' he cried to his servants. 'Come, if you are not all recreant!' Then two of them ran
up the steps to him. Swiftly he snatched a torch from the hand of one and sprang back into the
house. Before Gandalf could hinder him he thrust the brand amid the fuel, and at once it crackled
and roared into flame.
 Then Denethor leaped upon the table, and standing there wreathed in fire and smoke he took up
the staff of his stewardship that lay at his feet and broke it on his knee. Casting the pieces into the
blaze he bowed and laid himself on the table, clasping the _palantír_ with both hands upon his
breast. And it was said that ever after, if any man looked in that Stone, unless he had a great
strength of will to turn it to other purpose, he saw only two aged hands withering in flame.
 Gandalf in grief and horror turned his face away and closed the door. For a while he stood in
thought, silent upon the threshold, while those outside heard the greedy roaring of the fire within.
And then Denethor gave a great cry, and afterwards spoke no more, nor was ever again seen by
mortal men.
 'So passes Denethor, son of Ecthelion,' said Gandalf: Then he turned to Beregond and the Lord's
servants that stood there aghast. 'And so pass also the days of Gondor that you have known; for
good or evil they are ended. Ill deeds have been done here; but let now all enmity that lies between
you be put away, for it was contrived by the Enemy and works his will. You have been caught in a
net of warring duties that you did not weave. But think, you servants of the Lord, blind in your
obedience, that but for the treason of Beregond Faramir, Captain of the White Tower, would now
also be burned.
 'Bear away from this unhappy place your comrades who have fallen. And we will bear Faramir,
Steward of Gondor, to a place where he can sleep in peace, or die if that be his doom.'
 Then Gandalf and Beregond taking up the bier bore it away towards the Houses of Healing,
while behind them walked Pippin with downcast head. But the servants of the Lord stood gazing as
stricken men at the house of the dead; and even as Gandalf came to the end of Rath Dínen there
was a great noise. Looking back they saw the dome of the house crack and smokes issue forth; and
then with a rush and rumble of stone it fell in a flurry of fire; but still unabated the flames danced
and flickered among the ruins. Then in terror the servants fled and followed Gandalf.
 At length they came back to the Steward's Door, and Beregond looked with grief at the porter.
'This deed I shall ever rue,' he said; 'but a madness of haste was on me, and he would not listen, but
drew sword against me.' Then taking the key that he had wrested from the slain man he closed the
door and locked it. 'This should now be given to the Lord Faramir,' he said.
 'The Prince of Dol Amroth is in command in the absence of the Lord,' said Gandalf; 'but since
he is not here, I must take this on myself. I bid you keep the key and guard it, until the City is set in
order again.'
 Now at last they passed into the high circles of the City, and in the light of morning they went
their way towards the Houses of Healing; and these were fair houses set apart, for the care of those
who were grievously sick, but now they were prepared for the tending of men hurt in battle or
dying. They stood not far from the Citadel-gate, in the sixth circle, nigh to its southward wall, and
about them was a garden and a greensward with trees, the only such place in the City. There dwelt
the few women that had been permitted to remain in Minas Tirith, since they were skilled in
healing or in the service of the healers.
 But even as Gandalf and his companions came carrying the bier to the main door of the Houses,
they heard a great cry that went up from the field before the Gate and rising shrill and piercing into
the sky passed, and died away on the wind. So terrible was the cry that for a moment all stood still,
and yet when it had passed, suddenly their hearts were lifted up in such a hope as they had not
known since the darkness came out of the East; and it seemed to them that the light grew clear and
the sun broke through the clouds.
 But Gandalf's face was grave and sad, and bidding Beregond and Pippin to take Faramir into the
Houses of Healing, he went up on to the walls nearby; and there like a figure carven in white he
stood in the new sun and looked out. And he beheld with the sight that was given to him all that had
befallen; and when Éomer rode out from the forefront of his battle and stood beside those who lay
upon the field, he sighed, and he cast his cloak about him again, and went from the walls. And
Beregond and Pippin found him standing in thought before the door of the Houses when they came
out.
 They looked at him, and for a while he was silent. At last he spoke. 'My friends,' he said, 'and all
you people of this city and of the Western lands! Things of great sorrow and renown have come to
pass. Shall we weep or be glad? Beyond hope the Captain of our foes has been destroyed, and you
have heard the echo of his last despair. But he has not gone without woe and bitter loss. And that I
might have averted but for the madness of Denethor. So long has the reach of our Enemy become!
Alas! but now I perceive how his will was able to enter into the very heart of the City.
 'Though the Stewards deemed that it was a secret kept only by themselves, long ago I guessed
that here in the White Tower, one at least of the Seven Seeing Stones was preserved. In the days of
his wisdom Denethor did not presume to use it, nor to challenge Sauron, knowing the limits of his
own strength. But his wisdom failed; and I fear that as the peril of his realm grew he looked in the
Stone and was deceived: far too often, I guess, since Boromir departed. He was too great to be
subdued to the will of the Dark Power, he saw nonetheless only those things which that Power
permitted him to see. The knowledge which he obtained was, doubtless, often of service to him; yet
the vision of the great might of Mordor that was shown to him fed the despair of his heart until it
overthrew his mind.'
 'Now I understand what seemed so strange to me!' said Pippin shuddering at his memories as he
spoke. 'The Lord went away from the room where Faramir lay; and it was only when he returned
that I first thought he was changed, old and broken.'
 'It was in the very hour that Faramir was brought to the Tower that many of us saw a strange
light in the topmost chamber,' said Beregond. 'But we have seen that light before, and it has long
been rumoured in the City, that the Lord would at times wrestle in thought with his Enemy.'
 'Alas! then I have guessed rightly,' said Gandalf. 'Thus the will of Sauron entered into Minas
Tirith; and thus I have been delayed here. And here I shall still be forced to remain, for I shall soon
have other charges, not Faramir only.
 'Now I must go down to meet those who come. I have seen a sight upon the field that is very
grievous to my heart, and greater sorrow may yet come to pass. Come with me, Pippin! But you,
Beregond, should return to the Citadel and tell the chief of the Guard there what has befallen. It will
be his duty, I fear, to withdraw you from the Guard; but say to him that, if I may give him counsel,
you should be sent to the Houses of Healing, to be the guard and servant of your captain, and to be
at his side when he awakes – if that shall ever be again. For by you he was saved from the fire. Go
now! I shall return soon.'
 With that he turned away and went with Pippin down towards the lower city. And even as they
hastened on their way the wind brought a grey rain, and all the fires sank, and there arose a great
smoke before them.
 _Chapter 8_
 The Houses of Healing
 A mist was in Merry's eyes of tears and weariness when they drew near the ruined Gate of
Minas Tirith. He gave little heed to the wreck and slaughter that lay about all. Fire and smoke and
stench was in the air; for many engines had been burned or cast into the fire-pits, and many of the
slain also, while here and there lay many carcases of the great Southron monsters, half-burned, or
broken by stone-cast, or shot through the eyes by the valiant archers of Morthond. The flying rain
had ceased for a time, and the sun gleamed up above; but all the lower city was still wrapped in a
smouldering reek.
 Already men were labouring to clear a way through the jetsam of battle; and now out from the
Gate came some bearing litters. Gently they laid Éowyn upon soft pillows; but the king's body they
covered with a great cloth of gold, and they bore torches about him, and their flames, pale in the
sunlight, were fluttered by the wind.
 So Théoden and Éowyn came to the City of Gondor, and all who saw them bared their heads
and bowed; and they passed through the ash and fume of the burned circle, and went on and up
along the streets of stone. To Merry the ascent seemed agelong, a meaningless journey in a hateful
dream, going on and on to some dim ending that memory cannot seize.
 Slowly the lights of the torches in front of him flickered and went out, and he was walking in a
darkness; and he thought: 'This is a tunnel leading to a tomb; there we shall stay forever.' But
suddenly into his dream there fell a living voice.
 'Well, Merry! Thank goodness I have found you!'
 He looked up and the mist before his eyes cleared a little. There was Pippin! They were face to
face in a narrow lane, and but for themselves it was empty. He rubbed his eyes.
 'Where is the king?' he said. 'And Éowyn?' Then he stumbled and sat down on a doorstep and
began to weep again.
 'They have gone up into the Citadel,' said Pippin. 'I think you must have fallen asleep on your
feet and taken the wrong turning. When we found that you were not with them, Gandalf sent me to
look for you. Poor old Merry! How glad I am to see you again! But you are worn out, and I won't
bother you with any talk. But tell me, are you hurt, or wounded?'
 'No,' said Merry. 'Well, no, I don't think so. But I can't use my right arm, Pippin, not since I
stabbed him. And my sword burned all away like a piece of wood.'
 Pippin's face was anxious. 'Well, you had better come with me as quick as you can,' he said. 'I
wish I could carry you. You aren't fit to walk any further. They shouldn't have let you walk at all;
but you must forgive them. So many dreadful things have happened in the City, Merry, that one
poor hobbit coming in from the battle is easily overlooked.'
'It's not always a misfortune being overlooked,' said Merry. 'I was overlooked just now by – no,
no, I can't speak of it. Help me, Pippin! It's all going dark again, and my arm is so cold.'
 'Lean on me, Merry lad!' said Pippin. 'Come now! Foot by foot. It's not far.'
 'Are you going to bury me?' said Merry.
 'No, indeed!' said Pippin, trying to sound cheerful, though his heart was wrung with fear and
pity. 'No, we are going to the Houses of Healing.'
 They turned out of the lane that ran between tall houses and the outer wall of the fourth circle,
and they regained the main street climbing up to the Citadel. Step by step they went, while Merry
swayed and murmured as one in sleep.
 'I'll never get him there,' thought Pippin. 'Is there no one to help me? I can't leave him here.' Just
then to his surprise a boy came running up behind, and as he passed he recognized Bergil
Beregond's son.
 'Hullo, Bergil!' he called. 'Where are you going? Glad to see you again, and still alive!'
 'I am running errands for the Healers,' said Bergil. 'I cannot stay.'
 'Don't!' said Pippin. 'But tell them up there that I have a sick hobbit, a _perian_ mind you, come
from the battle-field. I don't think he can walk so far. If Mithrandir is there, he will be glad of the
message.' Bergil ran on.
 'I'd better wait here,' thought Pippin. So he let Merry sink gently down on to the pavement in a
patch of sunlight, and then he sat down beside him, laying Merry's head in his lap. He felt his body
and limbs gently, and took his friend's hands in his own. The right hand felt icy to the touch.
 It was not long before Gandalf himself came in search of them. He stooped over Merry and
caressed his brow; then he lifted him carefully. 'He should have been borne in honour into this city,'
he said. 'He has well repaid my trust; for if Elrond had not yielded to me, neither of you would have
set out; and then far more grievous would the evils of this day have been.' He sighed. 'And yet here
is another charge on my hands, while all the time the battle hangs in the balance.'
 So at last Faramir and Éowyn and Meriadoc were laid in beds in the Houses of Healing; and
there they were tended well. For though all lore was in these latter days fallen from its fullness of
old, the leechcraft of Gondor was still wise, and skilled in the healing of wound and hurt, and all
such sickness as east of the Sea mortal men were subject to. Save old age only. For that they had
found no cure; and indeed the span of their lives had now waned to little more than that of other
men, and those among them who passed the tale of five score years with vigour were grown few,
save in some houses of purer blood. But now their art and knowledge were baffled; for there were
many sick of a malady that would not be healed; and they called it the Black Shadow, for it came
from the Nazgûl. And those who were stricken with it fell slowly into an ever deeper dream, and
then passed to silence and a deadly cold, and so died. And it seemed to the tenders of the sick that
on the Halfling and on the Lady of Rohan this malady lay heavily. Still at whiles as the morning
wore away they would speak, murmuring in their dreams; and the watchers listened to all that they
said, hoping perhaps to learn something that would help them to understand their hurts. But soon
they began to fall down into the darkness, and as the sun turned west a grey shadow crept over their
faces. But Faramir burned with a fever that would not abate.
 Gandalf went from one to the other full of care, and he was told all that the watchers could hear.
And so the day passed, while the great battle outside went on with shifting hopes and strange
tidings; and still Gandalf waited and watched and did not go forth; till at last the red sunset filled all
the sky, and the light through the windows fell on the grey faces of the sick. Then it seemed to
those who stood by that in the glow the faces flushed softly as with health returning, but it was only
a mockery of hope.
 Then an old wife, Ioreth, the eldest of the women who served in that house, looking on the fair
face of Faramir, wept, for all the people loved him. And she said: 'Alas! if he should die. Would
that there were kings in Gondor, as there were once upon a time, they say! For it is said in old lore:
_The hands of the king are the hands of a healer_. And so the rightful king could ever be known.'
 And Gandalf, who stood by, said: 'Men may long remember your words, Ioreth! For there is
hope in them. Maybe a king has indeed returned to Gondor; or have you not heard the strange
tidings that have come to the City?'
 'I have been too busy with this and that to heed all the crying and shouting,' she answered. 'All I
hope is that those murdering devils do not come to this House and trouble the sick.'
 Then Gandalf went out in haste, and already the fire in the sky was burning out, and the
smouldering hills were fading, while ash-grey evening crept over the fields.
 Now as the sun went down Aragorn and Éomer and Imrahil drew near the City with their
captains and knights; and when they came before the Gate Aragorn said:
 'Behold the Sun setting in a great fire! It is a sign of the end and fall of many things, and a
change in the tides of the world. But this City and realm has rested in the charge of the Stewards for
many long years, and I fear that if I enter it unbidden, then doubt and debate may arise, which
should not be while this war is fought. I will not enter in, nor make any claim, until it be seen
whether we or Mordor shall prevail. Men shall pitch my tents upon the field, and here I will await
the welcome of the Lord of the City.'
 But Éomer said: 'Already you have raised the banner of the Kings and displayed the tokens of
Elendil's House. Will you suffer these to be challenged?'
 'No,' said Aragorn. 'But I deem the time unripe; and I have no mind for strife except with our
Enemy and his servants.'
 And the Prince Imrahil said. Your words, lord, are wise, if one who is a kinsman of the Lord
Denethor may counsel you in this matter. He is strong-willed and proud, but old; and his mood has
been strange since his son was stricken down. Yet I would not have you remain like a beggar at the
door.'
 'Not a beggar,' said Aragorn. 'Say a captain of the Rangers, who are unused to cities and houses
of stone.' And he commanded that his banner should be furled; and he did off the Star of the North
Kingdom and gave it to the keeping of the sons of Elrond.
 Then the Prince Imrahil and Éomer of Rohan left him and passed through the City and the
tumult of the people, and mounted to the Citadel; and they came to the Hall of the Tower, seeking
the Steward. But they found his chair empty, and before the dais lay Théoden King of the Mark
upon a bed of state; and twelve torches stood about it, and twelve guards, knights both of Rohan
and Gondor. And the hangings of the bed were of green and white, but upon the king was laid the
great cloth of gold up to his breast, and upon that his unsheathed sword, and at his feet his shield,
The light of the torches shimmered in his white hair like sun in the spray of a fountain, but his face
was fair and young, save that a peace lay on it beyond the reach of youth; and it seemed that he
slept.
 When they had stood silent for a time beside the king, Imrahil said: 'Where is the Steward? And
where also is Mithrandir?'
 And one of the guards answered: 'The Steward of Gondor is in the Houses of Healing.'
 But Éomer said: 'Where is the Lady Éowyn, my sister; for surely she should be lying beside the
king, and in no less honour? Where have they bestowed her?'
 And Imrahil said: 'But the Lady Éowyn was yet living when they bore her hither. Did you not
know?'
 Then hope unlooked-for came so suddenly to Éomer's heart, and with it the bite of care and fear
renewed, that he said no more, but turned and went swiftly from the hall; and the Prince followed
him. And when they came forth evening had fallen and many stars were in the sky. And there came
Gandalf on foot and with him one cloaked in grey; and they met before the doors of the Houses of
Healing. And they greeted Gandalf and said: 'We seek the Steward, and men say that he is in this
House. Has any hurt befallen him? And the Lady Éowyn, where is she?'
 And Gandalf answered: 'She lies within and is not dead, but is near death. But the Lord Faramir
was wounded by an evil dart, as you have heard, and he is now the Steward; for Denethor has
departed, and his house is in ashes.' And they were filled with grief and wonder at the tale that he
told.
 But Imrahil said: 'So victory is shorn of gladness, and it is bitter bought, if both Gondor and
Rohan are in one day bereft of their lords. Éomer rules the Rohirrim. Who shall rule the City
meanwhile? Shall we not send now for the Lord Aragorn?'
 And the cloaked man spoke and said: 'He is come.' And they saw as he stepped into the light of
the lantern by the door that it was Aragorn, wrapped in the grey cloak of Lórien above his mail, and
bearing no other token than the green stone of Galadriel. 'I have come because Gandalf begs me to
do so,' he said. 'But for the present I am but the Captain of the Dúnedain of Arnor; and the Lord of
Dol Amroth shall rule the City until Faramir awakes. But it is my counsel that Gandalf should rule
us all in the days that follow and in our dealings with the Enemy.' And they agreed upon that.
 Then Gandalf said: 'Let us not stay at the door, for the time is urgent. Let us enter! For it is only
in the coming of Aragorn that any hope remains for the sick that lie in the House. Thus spake Ioreth,
wise-woman of Gondor: _The hands of the king are the hands of a healer, and so shall the rightful
king be known_.'
 Then Aragorn entered first and the others followed. And there at the door were two guards in the
livery of the Citadel: one tall, but the other scarce the height of a boy; and when he saw them he
cried aloud in surprise and joy.
 'Strider! How splendid! Do you know, I guessed it was you in the black ships. But they were all
shouting _corsairs_ and wouldn't listen to me. How did you do it?'
 Aragorn laughed, and took the hobbit by the hand. 'Well met indeed!' he said. 'But there is not
time yet for travellers' tales.'
 But Imrahil said to Éomer: 'Is it thus that we speak to our kings? Yet maybe he will wear his
crown in some other name!'
 And Aragorn hearing him, turned and said: 'Verily, for in the high tongue of old I am _Elessar_,
the _Elfstone_, and _Envinyatar_, the Renewer': and he lifted from his breast the green stone that
lay there. 'But Strider shall be the name of my house, if that be ever established. In the high tongue
it will not sound so ill, and _Telcontar_ I will be and all the heirs of my body.'
 And with that they passed into the House; and as they went towards the rooms where the sick
were tended Gandalf told of the deeds of Éowyn and Meriadoc. 'For,' he said, 'long have I stood by
them and at first they spoke much in their dreaming, before they sank into the deadly darkness.
Also it is given to me to see many things far off.'
 Aragorn went first to Faramir, and then to the Lady Éowyn, and last to Merry. When he had
looked on the faces of the sick and seen their hurts he sighed. 'Here I must put forth all such power
and skill as is given to me,' he said. 'Would that Elrond were here, for he is the eldest of all our race,
and has the greater power.'
 And Éomer seeing that he was sorrowful and weary said: 'First you must rest, surely, and at the
least eat a little?'
 But Aragorn answered: 'Nay, for these three, and most soon for Faramir, time is running out. All
speed is needed.'
 Then he called to Ioreth and he said: 'You have store in this House of the herbs of healing?'
 'Yes, lord,' she answered; 'but not enough, I reckon, for all that will need them. But I am sure I
do not know where we shall find more; for all things are amiss in these dreadful days, what with
fires and burnings, and the lads that run errands so few, and all the roads blocked. Why, it is days
out of count since ever a carrier came in from Lossarnach to the market! But we do our best in this
House with what we have, as I am sure your lordship will know.'
 'I will judge that when I see,' said Aragorn. 'One thing also is short time for speech. Have you
_athelas_?'
 'I do not know, I am sure, lord,' she answered, 'at least not by that name. I will go and ask of the
herb-master; he knows all the old names.'
 'It is also called _kingsfoil_,' said Aragorn; 'and maybe you know it by that name, for so the
country-folk call it in these latter days.' 'Oh that!' said Ioreth. 'Well, if your lordship had named it at
first I could have told you. No, we have none of it, I am sure. Why, I have never heard that it had
any great virtue; and indeed I have often said to my sisters when we came upon it growing in the
woods: "kingsfoil" I said, " 'tis a strange name, and I wonder why 'tis called so; for if I were a king,
I would have plants more bright in my garden". Still it smells sweet when bruised, does it not? If
sweet is the right word: wholesome, maybe, is nearer.'
 'Wholesome verily,' said Aragorn. 'And now, dame, if you love the Lord Faramir, run as quick
as your tongue and get me kingsfoil, if there is a leaf in the City.'
 'And if not,' said Gandalf, 'I will ride to Lossarnach with Ioreth behind me, and she shall take me
to the woods, but not to her sisters. And Shadowfax shall show her the meaning of haste.'
 When Ioreth was gone, Aragorn bade the other women to make water hot. Then he took
Faramir's hand in his, and laid the other hand upon the sick man's brow. It was drenched with sweat;
but Faramir did not move or make any sign, and seemed hardly to breathe.
 'He is nearly spent,' said Aragorn turning to Gandalf. 'But this comes not from the wound. See!
that is healing. Had he been smitten by some dart of the Nazgûl, as you thought, he would have
died that night. This hurt was given by some Southron arrow, I would guess. Who drew it forth?
Was it kept?'
 'I drew it forth,' said Imrahil, 'and staunched the wound. But I did not keep the arrow, for we had
much to do. It was, as I remember, just such a dart as the Southrons use. Yet I believed that it came
from the Shadows above, for else his fever and sickness were not to be understood; since the
wound was not deep or vital. How then do you read the matter?'
 'Weariness, grief for his father's mood, a wound, and over all the Black Breath,' said Aragorn.
'He is a man of staunch will, for already he had come close under the Shadow before ever he rode
to battle on the out-walls. Slowly the dark must have crept on him, even as he fought and strove to
hold his outpost. Would that I could have been here sooner!'
 Thereupon the herb-master entered. 'Your lordship asked for kingsfoil, as the rustics name it, he
said; or _athelas_ in the noble tongue, or to those who know somewhat of the Valinorean. . .'
 'I do so,' said Aragorn, 'and I care not whether you say now _asëa aranion_ or _kingsfoil_, so
long as you have some.'
 'Your pardon lord!' said the man. 'I see you are a lore-master, not merely a captain of war. But
alas! sir, we do not keep this thing in the Houses of Healing, where only the gravely hurt or sick are
tended. For it has no virtue that we know of, save perhaps to sweeten a fouled air, or to drive away
some passing heaviness. Unless, of course, you give heed to rhymes of old days which women such
as our good Ioreth still repeat without understanding.
 When the black breath blows
 and death's shadow grows
 and all lights pass,
 come athelas! come athelas!
 Life to the dying
 In the king's hand lying!
 It is but a doggrel, I fear, garbled in the memory of old wives. Its meaning I leave to your
judgement, if indeed it has any. But old folk still use an infusion of the herb for headaches.'
 'Then in the name of the king, go and find some old man of less lore and more wisdom who
keeps some in his house!' cried Gandalf.
 Now Aragorn knelt beside Faramir, and held a hand upon his brow. And those that watched felt
that some great struggle was going on. For Aragorn's face grew grey with weariness; and ever and
anon he called the name of Faramir, but each time more faintly to their hearing, as if Aragorn
himself was removed from them, and walked afar in some dark vale, calling for one that was lost.
 And at last Bergil came running in, and he bore six leaves in a cloth. 'It is kingsfoil, Sir,' he said;
'but not fresh, I fear. It must have been culled two weeks ago at the least. I hope it will serve, Sir?'
Then looking at Faramir he burst into tears.
 But Aragorn smiled. 'It will serve,' he said. 'The worst is now over. Stay and be comforted!'
Then taking two leaves, he laid them on his hands and breathed on them, and then he crushed them,
and straightway a living freshness filled the room, as if the air itself awoke and tingled, sparkling
with joy. And then he cast the leaves into the bowls of steaming water that were brought to him,
and at once all hearts were lightened. For the fragrance that came to each was like a memory of
dewy mornings of unshadowed sun in some land of which the fair world in Spring is itself but a
fleeting memory. But Aragorn stood up as one refreshed, and his eyes smiled as he held a bowl
before Faramir's dreaming face.
 'Well now! Who would have believed it?' said Ioreth to a woman that stood beside her. 'The
weed is better than I thought. It reminds me of the roses of Imloth Melui when I was a lass, and no
king could ask for better.'
 Suddenly Faramir stirred, and he opened his eyes, and he looked on Aragorn who bent over him;
and a light of knowledge and love was kindled in his eyes, and he spoke softly. 'My lord, you called
me. I come. What does the king command?'
 'Walk no more in the shadows, but awake!' said Aragorn. 'You are weary. Rest a while, and take
food, and be ready when I return.'
 'I will, lord,' said Faramir. 'For who would lie idle when the king has returned?'
 'Farewell then for a while!' said Aragorn. 'I must go to others who need me.' And he left the
chamber with Gandalf and Imrahil; but Beregond and his son remained behind, unable to contain
their joy. As he followed Gandalf and shut the door Pippin heard Ioreth exclaim:
 'King! Did you hear that? What did I say? The hands of a healer, I said.' And soon the word had
gone out from the House that the king was indeed come among them, and after war he brought
healing; and the news ran through the City.
 But Aragorn came to Éowyn, and he said: 'Here there is a grievous hurt and a heavy blow. The
arm that was broken has been tended with due skill, and it will mend in time, if she has the strength
to live: It is the shield-arm that is maimed; but the chief evil comes through the sword-arm. In that
there now seems no life, although it is unbroken.
 'Alas! For she was pitted against a foe beyond the strength of her mind or body. And those who
will take a weapon to such an enemy must be sterner than steel, if the very shock shall not destroy
them. It was an evil doom that set her in his path. For she is a fair maiden, fairest lady of a house of
queens. And yet I know not how I should speak of her. When I first looked on her and perceived
her unhappiness, it seemed to me that I saw a white flower standing straight and proud, shapely as a
lily, and yet knew that it was hard, as if wrought by elf-wrights out of steel. Or was it, maybe, a
frost that had turned its sap to ice, and so it stood, bitter-sweet, still fair to see, but stricken, soon to
fall and die? Her malady begins far back before this day, does it not, Éomer?'
 'I marvel that you should ask me, lord,' he answered. 'For I hold you blameless in this matter, as
in all else; yet I knew not that Éowyn, my sister, was touched by any frost, until she first looked on
you. Care and dread she had, and shared with me, in the days of Wormtongue and the king's
bewitchment; and she tended the king in growing fear. But that did not bring her to this pass!'
 'My friend,' said Gandalf, 'you had horses, and deeds of arms, and the free fields; but she, born
in the body of a maid, had a spirit and courage at least the match of yours. Yet she was doomed to
wait upon an old man, whom she loved as a father, and watch him falling into a mean dishonoured
dotage; and her part seemed to her more ignoble than that of the staff he leaned on.
 'Think you that Wormtongue had poison only for Théoden's ears? _Dotard! What is the house of
Eorl but a thatched barn where brigands drink in the reek, and their brats roll on the floor among
their dogs?_Have you not heard those words before? Saruman spoke them, the teacher of
Wormtongue. Though I do not doubt that Wormtongue at home wrapped their meaning in terms
more cunning. My lord, if your sister's love for you, and her will still bent to her duty, had not
restrained her lips; you might have heard even such things as these escape them. But who knows
what she spoke to the darkness, alone, in the bitter watches of the night, when all her life seemed
shrinking, and the walls of her bower closing in about her, a hutch to trammel some wild thing in?'
 Then Éomer was silent, and looked on his sister, as if pondering anew all the days of their past
life together. But Aragorn said: 'I saw also what you saw, Éomer. Few other griefs amid the ill
chances of this world have more bitterness and shame for a man's heart than to behold the love of a
lady so fair and brave that cannot be returned Sorrow and pity have followed me ever since I left
her desperate in Dunharrow and rode to the Paths of the Dead; and no fear upon that way was so
present as the fear for what might befall her. And yet, Éomer, I say to you that she loves you more
truly than me; for you she loves and knows; but in me she loves only a shadow and a thought: a
hope of glory and great deeds, and lands far from the fields of Rohan.
 'I have, maybe, the power to heal her body, and to recall her from the dark valley. But to what
she will awake: hope, or forgetfulness, or despair, I do not know. And if to despair, then she will
die, unless other healing comes which I cannot bring. Alas! for her deeds have set her among the
queens of great renown.'
 Then Aragorn stooped and looked in her face, and it was indeed white as a lily, cold as frost,
and hard as graven stone. But he bent and kissed her on the brow, and called her softly, saying:
 'Éowyn Éomund's daughter, awake! For your enemy has passed away!'
She did not stir, but now she began again to breathe deeply, so that her breast rose and fell
beneath the white linen of the sheet. Once more Aragorn bruised two leaves of _athelas_ and cast
them into steaming water; and he laved her brow with it, and her right arm lying cold and nerveless
on the coverlet.
 Then, whether Aragorn had indeed some forgotten power of Westernesse, or whether it was but
his words of the Lady Éowyn that wrought on them, as the sweet influence of the herb stole about
the chamber it seemed to those who stood by that a keen wind blew through the window, and it
bore no scent, but was an air wholly fresh and clean and young, as if it had not before been
breathed by any living thing and came new-made from snowy mountains high beneath a dome of
stars, or from shores of silver far away washed by seas of foam.
 'Awake, Éowyn, Lady of Rohan!' said Aragorn again, and he took her right hand in his and felt
it warm with life returning. 'Awake! The shadow is gone and all darkness is washed clean!' Then he
laid her hand in Éomer's and stepped away. 'Call her!' he said, and he passed silently from the
chamber.
 'Éowyn, Éowyn!' cried Éomer amid his tears. But she opened her eyes and said: 'Éomer! What
joy is this? For they said that you were slain. Nay, but that was only the dark voices in my dream.
How long have I been dreaming?'
 'Not long, my sister,' said Éomer. 'But think no more on it!'
 ' I am strangely weary,' she said. 'I must rest a little. But tell me, what of the Lord of the Mark?
Alas! Do not tell me that that was a dream for I know that it was not. He is dead as he foresaw.'
 'He is dead,' said Éomer, 'but he bade me say farewell to Éowyn dearer than daughter. He lies
now in great honour in the Citadel of Gondor.'
 'That is grievous,' she said. 'And yet it is good beyond all that I dared hope in the dark days,
when it seemed that the House of Eorl was sunk in honour less than any shepherd's cot. And what
of the king's esquire, the Halfling? Éomer, you shall make him a knight of the Riddermark, for he is
valiant!'
 'He lies nearby in this House, and I will go to him,' said Gandalf. 'Éomer shall stay here for a
while. But do not speak yet of war or woe, until you are made whole again. Great gladness it is to
see you wake again to health and hope, so valiant a lady!'
 'To health?' said Éowyn. 'It may be so. At least while there is an empty saddle of some fallen
Rider that I can fill, and there are deeds to do. But to hope? I do not know.'
 Gandalf and Pippin came to Merry's room, and there they found Aragorn standing by the bed.
'Poor old Merry!' cried Pippin, and he ran to the bedside, for it seemed to him that his friend looked
worse, and a greyness was in his face, as if a weight of years of sorrow lay on him; and suddenly a
fear seized Pippin that Merry would die.
 'Do not be afraid,' said Aragorn. 'I came in time, and I have called him back. He is weary now,
and grieved, and he has taken a hurt like the Lady Éowyn, daring to smite that deadly thing. But
these evils can be amended, so strong and gay a spirit is in him. His grief he will not forget; but it
will not darken his heart, it will teach him wisdom.'
 Then Aragorn laid his hand on Merry's head, and passing his hand gently through the brown
curls, he touched the eyelids, and called him by name. And when the fragrance of _athelas_ stole
through the room, like the scent of orchards, and of heather in the sunshine full of bees, suddenly
Merry awoke, and he said:
 'I am hungry. What is the time?'
 'Past supper-time now,' said Pippin; 'though I daresay I could bring you something, if they will
let me.'
 'They will indeed,' said Gandalf. 'And anything else that this Rider of Rohan may desire, if it can
be found in Minas Tirith, where his name is in honour.'
 'Good!' said Merry. 'Then I would like supper first, and after that a pipe.' At that his face clouded.
'No, not a pipe. I don't think I'll smoke again.'
 'Why not?' said Pippin.
 'Well,' answered Merry slowly. 'He is dead. It has brought it all back to me. He said he was sorry
he had never had a chance of talking herb-lore with me. Almost the last thing he ever said. I shan't
ever be able to smoke again without thinking of him, and that day, Pippin, when he rode up to
Isengard and was so polite.'
 'Smoke then, and think of him!' said Aragorn. 'For he was a gentle heart and a great king and
kept his oaths; and he rose out of the shadows to a last fair morning. Though your service to him
was brief, it should be a memory glad and honourable to the end of your days.'
 Merry smiled. 'Well then,' he said, 'if Strider will provide what is needed, I will smoke and think.
I had some of Saruman's best in my pack, but what became of it in the battle, I am sure I don't
know.'
 'Master Meriadoc,' said Aragorn, 'if you think that I have passed through the mountains and the
realm of Gondor with fire and sword to bring herbs to a careless soldier who throws away his gear,
you are mistaken. If your pack has not been found, then you must send for the herb-master of this
House. And he will tell you that he did not know that the herb you desire had any virtues, but that it
is called _westmansweed_ by the vulgar, and _galenas_ by the noble, and other names in other
tongues more learned, and after adding a few half-forgotten rhymes that he does not understand, he
will regretfully inform you that there is none in the House, and he will leave you to reflect on the
history of tongues. And so now must I. For I have not slept in such a bed as this, since I rode from
Dunharrow, nor eaten since the dark before dawn.'
 Merry seized his hand and kissed it. 'I am frightfully sorry,' he said. 'Go at once! Ever since that
night at Bree we have been a nuisance to you. But it is the way of my people to use light words at
such times and say less than they mean. We fear to say too much. It robs us of the right words when
a jest is out of place.'
 'I know that well, or I would not deal with you in the same way ' said Aragorn. 'May the Shire
live for ever unwithered!' And kissing Merry he went out, and Gandalf went with him.
 Pippin remained behind. 'Was there ever any one like him?' he said. 'Except Gandalf, of course.
I think they must be related. My dear ass, your pack is lying by your bed, and you had it on your
back when I met you. He saw it all the time, of course. And anyway I have some stuff of my own.
Come on now! Longbottom Leaf it is. Fill up while I run and see about some food. And then let's
be easy for a bit. Dear me! We Tooks and Brandybucks, we can't live long on the heights.'
 'No,' said Merry. 'I can't. Not yet, at any rate. But at least, Pippin, we can now see them, and
honour them. It is best to love first what you are fitted to love, I suppose: you must start somewhere
and have some roots, and the soil of the Shire is deep. Still there are things deeper and higher; and
not a gaffer could tend his garden in what he calls peace but for them, whether he knows about
them or not. I am glad that I know about them, a little. But I don't know why I am talking like this.
Where is that leaf? And get my pipe out of my pack, if it isn't broken.'
 Aragorn and Gandalf went now to the Warden of the Houses of Healing, and they counselled
him that Faramir and Éowyn should remain there and still be tended with care for many days.
 'The Lady Éowyn,' said Aragorn, 'will wish soon to rise and depart; but she should not be
permitted to do so, if you can in any way restrain her, until at least ten days be passed.'
 'As for Faramir,' said Gandalf, 'he must soon learn that his father is dead. But the full tale of the
madness of Denethor should not be told to him, until he is quite healed and has duties to do. See
that Beregond and the _perian_ who were present do not speak to him of these things yet!'
 And the other _perian_ Meriadoc who is under my care, what of him?' said the Warden.
 'It is likely that he will be fit to arise tomorrow, for a short while,' said Aragorn. 'Let him do so,
if he wishes. He may walk a little in the care of his friends.'
 'They are a remarkable race,' said the Warden, nodding his head. 'Very tough in the fibre, I
deem.'
 At the doors of the Houses many were already gathered to see Aragorn, and they followed after
him; and when at last he had supped, men came and prayed that he would heal their kinsmen or
their friends whose lives were in peril through hurt or wound, or who lay under the Black Shadow.
And Aragorn arose and went out, and he sent for the sons of Elrond, and together they laboured far
into the night. And word went through the City: 'The King is come again indeed.' And they named
him Elfstone, because of the green stone that he wore, and so the name which it was foretold at his
birth that he should bear was chosen for him by his own people.
 And when he could labour no more, he cast his cloak about him, and slipped out of the City, and
went to his tent just ere dawn and slept for a little. And in the morning the banner of Dol Amroth, a
white ship like a swan upon blue water, floated from the Tower, and men looked up and wondered
if the coming of the King had been but a dream. 
